New Mexico, session 2026, SB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the interstate stream commission for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 to plan, implement and maintain bosque management projects in the middle Rio Grande valley. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. .232521.3